Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-124
Credential holder's advertisement; contents; credential; availability; identity of profession or business.

(1) Any credential holder's advertisement for health care services shall identify the type of credential or credentials held by the credential holder pursuant to the definitions, titles, and abbreviations authorized under the practice act applicable to his or her credential or credentials or the examination designations required for a credential under the practice act applicable to his or her credential or credentials. The advertisement shall not include deceptive or misleading information and shall not include any affirmative communication or representation that misstates, falsely describes, or falsely represents the skills, training, expertise, education, board certification, or credential or credentials of the credential holder.

(2) Every person credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall make his or her current credential available upon request. The department, with the recommendation of the appropriate board, if any, shall determine how a consumer will be able to identify a credential holder. The method of identification shall be clear and easily accessed and used by the consumer. All signs, announcements, stationery, and advertisements of persons credentialed under the act shall identify the profession or business for which the credential is held.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 7, p. 456;

C.S.1929, § 71-206;

Laws 1935, c. 142, § 28, p. 529;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-206;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 2, p. 539;

R.S.1943, § 71-107;

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 6, p. 1076;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 4, p. 1051;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 28;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 14;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 14;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 105;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-107;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 24;

Laws 2015, LB452, § 1.